Utah statutes.
32A-12-501 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Disposition of liquor items shipped to the
department.
(1)  Any liquor item received by the department from a supplier as a sample or
as an item not specifically listed on a department purchase order shall be
handled in accordance with and subject to Subsection 32A-12-603(4)(c)(ix).
(2)  Funds of the department may not be used to pay freight or charges on a
sample or any liquor item:
(a)  shipped to the department by suppliers; and
(b)  not listed on a department purchase order.
